Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Slow-Moving Vehicle Emblem

189.810.
Definitions.

“Slow-moving vehicle” includes farm machinery, including animal-drawn vehicles, highway construction and maintenance vehicles, and any other type of vehicle, except bicycles and electric low-speed scooters, capable of a rate of speed no greater than twenty-five (25) miles per hour.

“Slow-moving vehicle emblem” consists of a fluorescent yellow-orange triangle with a dark red reflective border, as specified in American Society of Agricultural Engineers R276 or Society of Automotive Engineers J943 standards, or consisting of reasonably similar reflective qualities as specified in said standards.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 45, § 1; 1974, ch. 101, § 5; 2019 ch. 22, § 8, effective June 27, 2019.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Kentucky Instructions To Juries (Civil), 5th Ed., Automobiles, §§
16.38, 16.41.

189.820.
Slow-moving vehicle emblem or reflective tape required — Display — Regulations for mounting emblem or reflective tape.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all slow-moving vehicles sold, leased, or rented in, or for use within, the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall have affixed to them as standard equipment a slow-moving vehicle emblem.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the slow-moving vehicle emblem shall be displayed as herein provided on all slow-moving vehicles operated day or night upon the public roads within the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The slow-moving vehicle emblem shall be mounted as near the center of the rear of the slow-moving vehicle as is practicable, and the lower edge of the emblem shall be mounted at least three feet (3) or more above the road surface, and shall be maintained in a clean, reflective condition.

As an alternative to the slow-moving vehicle emblem, one (1)-inch-wide white or silver reflective tape may be used on motorless slow-moving vehicles as follows:

The rear of the vehicle shall be covered with a minimum of one hundred (100) square inches of the reflective tape;

The reflective tape on the rear of the vehicle shall, at a minimum, outline the entire rear of the vehicle;

Each side of the vehicle shall be covered with a minimum of thirty-six (36) square inches of reflective tape; and

The highest point of the left front of the vehicle shall be covered with a minimum of twenty-four (24) square inches of reflective tape.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 45, § 2; 2012, ch. 53, § 2, effective April 11, 2012.

189.830.
Use of emblem or reflective tape restricted — Exemption from requirement.

The slow-moving vehicle emblem shall be restricted to the uses specified herein and the use on any other type of vehicle or on other objects is prohibited.

The slow-moving vehicle emblem shall not be required on trailers or other drawn vehicles which do not obstruct the slow-moving vehicle emblem required on the towing vehicle.

Highway construction or maintenance vehicles and public utility vehicles shall not require slow-moving vehicle emblems when being guarded by flagmen or flares.

The use of slow-moving vehicle emblems or alternative reflective tape, as required under KRS

189.820

, shall be in addition to any other reflective or lighting devices required by law.

The slow-moving vehicle emblem shall not be used on a bicycle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 45, § 3; 1974, ch. 101, § 6; 2012, ch. 53, § 3, effective April 11, 2012.

189.860.
Off-road vehicles.

“Off-road vehicle” means a motor vehicle capable of cross-country travel, without the benefit of a road or trail. It does not include a farm vehicle, a vehicle used for military or law enforcement purposes, a vehicle used in construction, mining, or other industrial-related purposes, aircraft, or any other vehicle registered under state law.

No person shall operate an off-road vehicle on any private or public property without the consent of the landowner, tenant, or governmental agency responsible for the property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 345, § 1(1), (2).

Opinions of Attorney General.

If an off-road vehicle is operated on a public highway it is no longer an “off-road” vehicle and both the vehicle and the operator of the vehicle must be licensed pursuant to the terms and provisions of KRS chapter 186.

OAG 77-258

.

While a city could not prohibit the use of an off-road vehicle on private property when permission has been granted by the landowner, the city could regulate such use if the object of the regulations is to promote public order, health, safety and protection of the lives and property of persons.

OAG 77-258

.

A snowmobile is not permitted to operate on a public highway in Kentucky.

OAG 79-85

.

A golf cart is neither a motor vehicle as defined in KRS

186.010

nor a motorcycle as defined in KRS

189.285

; a golf cart is an off-road vehicle which is covered by the provisions of this section and therefor, a golf cart cannot be licensed to operate on a public highway or the shoulder of a highway.

OAG 80-251

.

A city cannot by ordinance permit the use of golf carts on public roads or streets because the legislature has preempted the field of law governing motor vehicles.

OAG 80-358

.